District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Pre-Approved Housing Plans Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Biennial housing development cost review.
(a) The Department of Buildings (“Department”) shall establish a pre-approved housing

plan program (“program”).
(b) The program shall make available permit-ready building plans for repeatable
residential housing types, including:
(1) Rowhouses;
(2) Rowhouses with an Accessory Dwelling Unit;
(3) Duplexes;
(4) Triplexes;
(5) Small multifamily buildings up to 8 units.
(c) The Department may include additional types of housing in the program based on
housing production needs, construction costs, zoning requirements, and the feasibility of
standardizing building plans for that type of housing.
Sec. 3. Plan development and availability.
(a) The Department shall:
(1) Develop or competitively procure standardized, code-compliant plan sets, in
addition to allowing for previously approved plans to be re-used until the next building code
adoption;
(2) Make any plans developed by the Department available without charge, except
for reasonable reproduction or processing costs;
(3) Allow a charge to be passed through to the plan’s designer if the plan is not
publicly owned;
(4) For any plan where the designer retains liability for the plan’s use, allow an
additional charge at least sufficient to cover standard designer’s liability insurance premiums
related to the plan’s use;

(5) Publish applicable construction, zoning, and site requirements for each plan;
(6) Identify the permissible range of modifications to each plan; and
(7) Establish a process through which qualified architects, engineers, builders, and
property owners may adapt a pre-approved plan to a particular site.
(c) Use of a pre-approved plan shall not be mandatory for building developers.
Sec. 4. Expedited review.
(a) A permit application using a pre-approved housing plan and complying with the
applicable conditions established by the Department shall be eligible for an expedited permit
review.
(b) The Department shall establish by rule:
(1) The documentation required to demonstrate compliance with a pre-approved
plan;
(2) The maximum permissible deviations from a pre-approved plan;
(3) A review timeline for qualifying applications; and
(4) Circumstances under which a development, as defined in DC Official
Code § 6–102.01, shall be removed from the expedited process because of site-specific
conditions or material deviations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall limit the Department’s authority to require site-specific
review necessary to protect public health, safety, and compliance with the Zoning Regulations.
Sec. 5. Code review.
(a) If a change to the Construction Codes, as found in Title 12 of the District of Columbia
Municipal Regulations, or other applicable law materially affects a pre-approved plan, the
Department shall update the plan or remove it from the program.

(b) A development that received approval to use a pre-approved plan before a subsequent
Construction Code change shall not be required to redesign the development solely because the
plan was subsequently modified, except as otherwise required by law.
Sec. 6. Competition and procurement.
(a) The Department shall administer the program in a manner that preserves competition
among architects, engineers, builders, and developers by creating an accessible process for
participation.
(b) No person or entity shall receive an exclusive right to use a pre-approved plan.
(c) The Department may accept plans developed by qualified private parties for inclusion
in the program, subject to the Department’s review and approval. No submitter of a plan that is
included in the program shall be required to accept liability for their plan’s use without receiving
compensation for that plan, including fees at least sufficient to cover standard resulting increases
in liability insurance premiums.
Sec. 7. Reporting
Beginning one year after establishment of the program, and annually thereafter, the
Department of Buildings shall submit a report to the Council that includes:
(1) The number of pre-approved plans available;
(2) The number of permit applications using the plans;
(3) The number of permits issued using the plans;
(4) Average review and approval times;
100 (5) Estimated savings in architectural and engineering costs;
101 (6) The number of housing units created through the program; and
102 (7) Recommendations for expanding or modifying the program.

103 Sec. 8. Fiscal impact statement.
104 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
105 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
106 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
107 Sec. 9. Effective date.
108 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
109 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
110 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
111 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
112 Columbia Register.